Oklahoma, session 2026, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.410 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a one-time credit against the income tax imposed by Section


2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes for the purchase of an e-


bike. The amount of the credit shall be Two Hundred Dollars


($200.00). If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer.


B. For purposes of this section, “e-bike” means a two-wheeled


or three-wheeled plug-in electric vehicle manufactured primarily for

Req. No. 441 Page 1


use on streets, roads, and highways, and capable of achieving a


speed greater than fifteen (15) miles per hour. E-bike shall not


mean an electric scooter that transports a person solely while


standing upright.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-441 QD 1/19/2025 5:37:46 AM



































Req. No. 441 Page 2